Maryland, session 2026, HB0806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0806*

HOUSE BILL 806
23–203.1.
THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE SECRETARY SHALL ESTABLISH AN
APPLICATION PROCESS AND REQUIREMENTS TO CERTIFY FACILITIES TO CONDUCT
TESTS OR INSPECTIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
23–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “CERTIFIED EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY” MEANS AN EMISSIONS
INSPECTION FACILITY CERTIFIED UNDER § 23–203 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) “Emissions control program” means the program requiring and implementing
the exhaust emissions test and the emissions equipment and misfueling inspection.
[(c)] (D) “Emissions equipment” means any emissions control device that has
been installed on a motor vehicle by a manufacturer of motor vehicles.
[(d)] (E) “Emissions equipment and misfueling inspection” means an inspection
to verify the presence of required emissions equipment and an inspection to determine that
the vehicle has not been misfueled.
(F) “EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY EQUIPPED TO
CONDUCT TESTS OR INSPECTIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
[(e)] (G) (1) “Emissions related repair” means the inspection, adjustment,
repair, or replacement of motor vehicle engine systems, subsystems, or components as
necessary to bring a motor vehicle into compliance with emissions standards adopted in
accordance with the provisions of this subtitle.
(2) “Emissions related repair” does not include adjustment, repair, or
replacement necessitated by tampering or misfueling.
[(f)] (H) (1) “Emissions standard” means a requirement that limits the
quantity, quality, rate, or concentration of emissions from a motor vehicle.
(2) “Emissions standard” includes a requirement that relates to the
operation or maintenance of a motor vehicle to assure continuous emissions reduction.

HOUSE BILL 806 3
[(g)] (I) “Exhaust emissions test” means the sampling and measurement of
certain components of motor vehicle exhaust to determine whether the motor vehicle is in
compliance with an emissions standard.
[(h)] (J) “Misfueling” means the introduction of leaded fuel into a motor vehicle
designed by the motor vehicle manufacturer to use unleaded fuel.
[(i)] (K) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Environment.
[23–203.
(a) (1) By rules and regulations, the Administration and the Secretary shall
provide for the establishment of facilities to conduct any tests or inspections required to be
performed under this subtitle.
(2) If the Administration and the Secretary determine that the system can
be installed and operated more effectively and economically by an independent contractor
than if installed and operated by the Administration and the Secretary, the Administration
and the Secretary may award the installation and operation of the inspection facilities to
an independent contractor selected in accordance with the bidding procedures established
by the laws of this State.
(3) (i) If, on or after July 1, 1991, the Administration and Secretary are
required by federal law to extend the emissions control program to additional areas of the
State and the Administration and Secretary determine that the inspection facilities can be
installed and operated more effectively and economically by one or more independent
contractors than if installed and operated by the Administration and Secretary, the
Administration and Secretary may:
1. Award the installation and operation of the inspection
facilities to one independent contractor for the installation and operation of all inspection
facilities in this State; or
2. Create separate regions of the areas of the State required
to participate in an emissions control program for the purpose of separately awarding
contracts for the installation and operation of the inspection facilities required for each
region to one or more independent contractors.
(ii) All independent contractors shall be selected in accordance with
the procedures established under the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(iii) The Administration and the Secretary may establish a statewide
centralized or decentralized program or any combination of centralized and decentralized
programs in separate regions of the State.
(b) If the program is awarded to an independent contractor to operate centralized
inspection facilities, the facilities shall be provided, equipped, and maintained by the

HOUSE BILL 806
independent contractor, and the operating personnel of the facilities shall be employees of
the contractor, and not of the State, and the contractor may not perform emissions related
repairs as defined in § 23–201 of this subtitle.
(c) The Administration and the Secretary shall determine, on or before March 1,
1998, whether the following criteria for establishing a decentralized retesting program
have been satisfied:
(1) Testing equipment and procedures, yielding results that correlate to
tests and inspections performed at centralized inspection facilities in the State within 95%
accuracy or within a different degree of accuracy approved by the Administration and the
Secretary, are feasible for use in certified repair facilities approved for retesting of vehicles;
and
(2) The establishment of a decentralized retesting option in the State does
not result in a loss of emissions reduction benefits to the State under the federal Clean Air
Act.
(d) If the Administration and the Secretary determine that the criteria listed in
subsection (c) of this section have not been met in a given year, they shall determine, on or
before March 1 of the succeeding year, whether the criteria have been satisfied in the
intervening period.
(e) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, if the program is
awarded to an independent contractor to operate centralized inspection facilities and if the
Administration and the Secretary have determined that the criteria listed in subsection (c)
of this section have been satisfied, the Administration and the Secretary shall propose
regulations to:
(1) Allow the owner of a vehicle that fails an exhaust emissions test or
emissions equipment and misfueling inspection at a centralized inspection facility to have
the vehicle retested at either a centralized inspection facility or an approved certified repair
facility;
(2) Allow a certified repair facility to retest vehicles if approved for that
purpose by the Department of the Environment;
(3) Require the initial exhaust emissions test and emissions equipment
and misfueling inspection in each biennial test cycle to be performed at a centralized
inspection facility;
(4) Establish criteria for testing equipment, procedures, and reporting of
retests for approved certified repair facilities;
(5) Provide for the suspension, revocation, or denial of renewal of approval
for a certified repair facility to perform retests if the Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee,

HOUSE BILL 806 5
determines that the facility has performed fraudulent retests or is not in compliance with
the regulations adopted under this subsection; and
(6) Establish a reasonable fee for approval of a certified repair facility to
perform retests, covering the costs of the approvals and oversight of the decentralized
retesting program.]
23–203.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CERTIFICATE” MEANS A CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE SECRETARY TO AN EMISSIONS INSPECTION
FACILITY FOR CONDUCTING TESTS OR INSPECTIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) AN EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY MUST BE CERTIFIED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION TO CONDUCT TESTS OR INSPECTIONS UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) TO APPLY FOR A CERTIFICATE AN APPLICANT SHALL:
(I) SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE ADMINISTRATION AND
THE SECRETARY ON THE FORM THAT THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE SECRETARY
REQUIRE; AND
(II) PAY ANY APPLICATION FEE SET BY THE ADMINISTRATION
AND THE SECRETARY.
(2) AN APPLICANT SHALL FILE A SEPARATE APPLICATION FOR EACH
EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE A
CERTIFICATE TO EACH EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 23–203.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
OF THE STATE MAY OWN AND OPERATE AN EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY.
(F) A CERTIFICATE IS VALID FOR 5 YEARS.
(G) AN EMPLOYEE OF A CERTIFIED EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY MAY
NOT PERFORM EMISSIONS–RELATED REPAIRS AS DEFINED IN § 23–201 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(H) THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO:

HOUSE BILL 806
(1) ALLOW THE OWNER OF A VEHICLE THAT FAILS AN EXHAUST
EMISSIONS TEST OR EMISSIONS EQUIPMENT AND MISFUELING INSPECTION AT A
CERTIFIED EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY TO HAVE THE VEHICLE RETESTED AT
EITHER A CERTIFIED EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY OR AN APPROVED
CERTIFIED REPAIR FACILITY;
(2) ALLOW A CERTIFIED REPAIR FACILITY TO RETEST VEHICLES IF
APPROVED FOR THAT PURPOSE BY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT;
(3) REQUIRE THE INITIAL EXHAUST EMISSIONS TEST AND EMISSIONS
EQUIPMENT AND MISFUELING INSPECTION IN EACH BIENNIAL TEST CYCLE TO BE
PERFORMED AT A CERTIFIED EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY;
(4) ESTABLISH CRITERIA FOR TESTING EQUIPMENT, PROCEDURES,
AND REPORTING OF RETESTS FOR APPROVED CERTIFIED REPAIR FACILITIES;
(5) PROVIDE FOR THE SUSPENSION, REVOCATION, OR DENIAL OF
RENEWAL OF APPROVAL FOR A CERTIFIED REPAIR FACILITY TO PERFORM RETESTS
IF THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE, DETERMINES THAT THE
FACILITY HAS PERFORMED FRAUDULENT RETESTS OR IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH
THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(6) ESTABLISH A REASONABLE FEE FOR APPROVAL OF A CERTIFIED
REPAIR FACILITY TO PERFORM RETESTS, COVERING THE COSTS OF THE APPROVALS
AND OVERSIGHT OF THE DECENTRALIZED RETESTING PROGRAM.
23–204.
[The facilities established or] CERTIFIED EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITIES
OR CERTIFIED REPAIR FACILITIES approved under § 23–203 of this subtitle shall conduct
the exhaust emissions tests and emissions equipment and misfueling inspections of motor
vehicles to determine whether each vehicle complies with emissions standards established
under this subtitle for that vehicle.
[23–205.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Administration and the
Secretary shall set the fee to be charged for each vehicle to be inspected and tested by a
facility.
(2) The fee established under this subsection:
(i) During the period from May 31, 1997, through June 30, 2025,
may not exceed $14;

HOUSE BILL 806 7
(ii) During the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, may
not exceed $30; and
(iii) Except as provided in paragraph (4)(iii) of this subsection, during
the period after July 1, 2026, shall equal at least the amount in the immediately preceding
fiscal year adjusted for inflation in accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(3) During the period after June 30, 2026, the fee established under this
subsection shall equal at least the amount in the immediately preceding fiscal year
adjusted for inflation in accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(4) (i) The inflation adjustment shall equal the product of multiplying
the amount of funding in the immediately preceding fiscal year by the percentage increase
in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers.
(ii) The percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers shall be determined by comparing the average of the index for the 12
months ending April 30 immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the funding
amount is being calculated to the average index for the prior 12 months.
(iii) If there is a decline or no growth in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, the fee amount under this paragraph shall remain unchanged.
(b) The fee shall be collected in a manner established by the Administration and
the Secretary.
(c) A specific portion of the fee shall be paid to or retained by the Administration
to cover the cost of administration and enforcement of the emissions control program, as
provided in the contract between the contractor and the State.]
23–205.
A CERTIFIED EMISSIONS INSPECTION FACILITY SHALL CHARGE A FEE TO
COVER THE COST OF INSPECTING AND TESTING A VEHICLE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2035.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That notwithstanding Section 2 of
this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.